Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB780.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 68 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 57ENCAMPMENTSSec.5701. Definitions.5702. Unauthorized encampments prohibited.5703. Enforcement.§ 5701. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Encampment." An unsheltered location where an accumulation 123456789101112131415161718 of temporary, makeshift or hand-built structures are utilized as a place of habitation for three or more unrelated individuals."Indication of nuisance." A condition of property that is consistent with a public or private nuisance at common law. The term includes:(1) Insufficient facilities to meet sanitation needs.(2) Visible, dangerous or unsanitary accumulation of camping paraphernalia, abandoned belongings, garbage or human waste.(3) Open fires.(4) Open air drug markets, visible drug use or accumulation of drug paraphernalia."Interested person." A resident or owner of real property adversely impacted by an unauthorized encampment. It shall be presumed that a parcel of real property located within 1600 feet of an unauthorized encampment is adversely impacted."Unauthorized encampment." An encampment on public or private property , without the property owner's express consent or authorization, where an indicatio n of nuisance exist s . § 5702. Unauthorized encampments prohibited.(a) Generally.--An u n authorized encampment is prohibited. (b) Owner's consent.--In the event a property owner gives express consent for an encampment:(1) The property owner shall prevent, mitigate and abate any condition of nuisance on the property.(2) The property owner shall comply with any health and safety regulations for camping or encampments adopted by ordinance of the municipality in which the property is located.(3) The property owner shall be liable for a dangerous 20250SB0780PN0837 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 condition on the property. By providing consent the owner is deemed to have constructive notice of any dangerous condition on the property.(4) If the property owner is a municipality, the owner waives any claim of immunity under 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 85 Subch. C (relating to actions against local parties).§ 5703. Enforcement.(a) Procedure.--(1) If an encampment appears to have an indication of nuisance, an interested party may submit a petition to the municipality in which the encampment is located for a determination as to whether the condition of the encampment constitutes a public nuisance.(2) If the encampment is located on private property and the municipality determines the condition of the encampment constitutes a public nuisance, the municipality shall send a notice to the property owner's last known address and post the notice prominently on the property affected. The notice shall inform the property owner that the property owner must eject the encampment in accordance with subsection (b) or give express consent to the encampment within 30 days of the municipality's determination.(3) If the encampment is located on public property of the municipality, the municipality shall eject the encampment in accordance with subsection (b) or give express consent of the encampment within 30 days of the municipality's determination.(4) A person aggrieved by a decision of the municipality under this subsection may appeal the decision to the Commonwealth Court. The appeal must be filed not later than 20250SB0780PN0837 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 30 days after the decision of the municipality. The case shall be heard in Commonwealth Court's appellate jurisdiction.(5) If the municipality has failed to take action within 90 days after the filing of a petition under paragraph (1), the petitioner may commence an action in Commonwealth Court to review the petition not later than 120 days after the filing of the petition. The action shall be tried de novo without a jury.(b) Duty to eject.--The owner of property on which an unauthorized encampment is located has a duty to eject the encampment through legal proceedings or by seeking the assistance of a law enforcement agency within 30 days of the receipt of a notice under subsection (a)(2).(c) Violation.--A failure to comply with the duty under subsection (b) or section 5702(b)(1) or (2) (relating to unauthorized encampments prohibited) is a violation of this chapter.(d) Civil penalty.--In addition to any other remedy at law or equity, a municipality may assess a civil penalty against an owner of property not to exceed $250 per violation, per day for a violation of this chapter.(e) Private cause of action.--(1) An interested person may:(i) seek declaratory or injunctive relief and actual damages in an appropriate court against a property owner, including a municipality, for a violation of this chapter;(ii) seek declaratory judgment that an encampment constitutes a public nuisance; or20250SB0780PN0837 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) seek to enforce by mandamus a duty of a municipality under this chapter.(2) An action against a municipality under this chapter shall be heard by Commonwealth Court under its original jurisdiction.(f) Reasonable expenses.--A court shall award reasonable expenses to an interested person in an action under subsection (d) if a final determination by the court is granted in favor of the interested person.(g) Physical removal.--(1) In addition to any other remedy at law or equity, and upon the failure of a property owner to comply with subsection (b) or section 5702(b), a municipality may, or in the case that a court has deemed the encampment a public nuisance shall within 30 days, cause the physical removal of the encampment and mitigation of any related public nuisance.(2) The municipality may collect the cost of the work and an additional 10% of the cost, together with all charges and expenses, from the owner and may file a municipal claim for the amounts or collect the amounts by action in assumpsit.(3) Prior to removal under this subsection the municipality shall:(i) Provide no less than seven days notice by posting, at the location of the encampment, the date and time of removal activities.(ii) Allow a reasonable opportunity for the individuals inhabiting the encampment to remove personal property from the encampment.(iii) Take reasonable steps to promote access to 20250SB0780PN0837 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 public and private services available to individuals experiencing homelessness as a result of the removal.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0780PN0837 - 6 - 123